Hawaii statutes.
[§551G-13] Jurisdiction. A court of
the State of Hawaii has jurisdiction to appoint a guardian or issue a
protective order for a respondent if:

(1) The State of Hawaii is the respondent's home
state;

(2) On the date the petition is filed, the State of
Hawaii is considered to be a significant-connection state and:

(A) The respondent does not have a home state
or a court of the respondent's home state has declined to exercise jurisdiction
because the State of Hawaii is a more appropriate forum; or

(B) The respondent has a home state, a
petition for an appointment or order is not pending in a court of that state or
another significant-connection state, and before the court makes the
appointment or issues the order:

(i) A petition for an appointment or order is
not filed in the respondent's home state;

(ii) An objection to the court's jurisdiction
is not filed by a person required to be notified of the proceeding; and

(iii) The court of the State of Hawaii concludes
that it is an appropriate forum under the factors set forth in section 551G-16;

(3) The State of Hawaii does not have jurisdiction
under either paragraph (1) or (2), the respondent's home state and all
significant-connection states have declined to exercise jurisdiction because
forum and jurisdiction is more appropriate in the State of Hawaii and would be
consistent with the United States Constitution and Hawaii state constitution;
or

(4) The requirements for special jurisdiction under
section 551G-14 are met. [L 2012, c 236, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next